Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.170

Inspection, certification may be requested by financially interested person.

Any person financially interested in any fruits or vegetables subject to the provisions of this chapter may apply to the director for inspection and certification as to whether such fruits or vegetables meet the requirements provided for in this chapter or rules adopted hereunder.

[ 1961 c 29 s 17.]